Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-185
Committee on Building Maintenance; membership; purpose.

The Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall appoint a select committee of the Legislative Council to consist of six members of the Legislature, to be known as the Committee on Building Maintenance, to exercise oversight of the deferred and preventive maintenance activities required in the Deferred Building Renewal Act. The selection of members shall be made on the basis of maintenance interest and knowledge. At least two members shall be selected from the Committee on Appropriations, one of whom shall be the chairperson of the Committee on Appropriations. On or before the sixth day of each regular legislative session, the board shall appoint or reappoint members of the committee. Such committee may utilize Legislative Council staff as required or may contract for necessary expertise. Such staff shall provide close liaison with the task force, all agencies subject to the act, and the Governor.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 13;

Laws 1980, LB 835, § 8;

Laws 1984, LB 838, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 19.